


National Steel Company









 














Products


Right from the time, when the Group National Steel Company began its operations in Cochin, in 2003, it had created a comfortable niche for itself while providing a one-stop solution for all steel requirements.

							Established in 2003 Group National Steel Company has emerged as one stop solution provider for all steel components requirements. The Company has been at the forefront of the industry by offering the most extensive range of steel building components and steel pre-engineered building system.

							Always ready to outline the specification and recommend optimal solutions for steel building components requirements, National Steel Company welcome technical inquiries from prospective buyers.

							National Steel Company has been striving from the beginning to blend the right human resources, optimal processes, and right methodologies to make sure that customer gets the best-in-class value and quality.

TMT Benefits   		    	  	

The use of high strength TMT results in 10-20% saving in steel consumption. 
							In developed countries, rebars with minimum yield strength of 500 N/mm2 (as against 415 N/mm2 in CTD bars) with high elongation values are specified for RCC work. 

							TMT rebars meet the requirement of even developed countries.

							TMT rebars are stronger, more bendable and have higher thermal stability because of unique technology used.

							TMT rebars ensure greater safety due to high elongation of 16-25%.
 
							TMT rebars are the ideal choice even for Seismic zones 3, 4 & 5. 

							Globalisation has brought in awareness in India about the deficiencies of CTD bars (and superiorities of TMT bars) as the demand for proper Quenched & Self Tempered TMT rebars is increasing even in India.

							The German Cooling Technology, as it is the globally preferred choice. We are among very few companies who are successful in producing right TMT rebars with proper specifications. The consumers of TMT rebars must ensure that they are using Graded TMT rebars. This is essential as many rolling mills is India are merely spraying water on the bars in an unscientific way and selling them as TMT rebars. Their strength is even less then CTD bars. The process is simple and effective. It is Worker Friendly due to its unique process and proprietory hardware. Buland TMT rebars are preffered choice of civil and structural designers worldwide.

Properties

Corrosion Resistance Properties   		 
							Controlled water-cooling prevents the formation of carbides which has been cited as the main cause for the corrosive nature of common bars. Another reason for better corrosion resistance properties is the absence of surface torsional stresses caused by the cold twisting (Torsteel) process. 

Weldability   	  	 
							TMT rebars with carbon content less than 0.25% can be used for butt and other weld joints without reduction in strength at the welded joint. 

Bend Properties   	  	 
							TMT  rebars have excellent bend properties due to the unique ductility (elongation values) obtained. 

Fire Resistance   	  	 
							Unlike Torsteel and CTD rebars, TMT bars have high thermal stability. They are the preferred choice when elevated temperature of 400-6000C may be encountered. 

Earthquake Resistance   	  	  
							TMT rebars with typical elongation of 16-25%, (well above the minimum 14.5% Specified in IS 1786), are suitable for use even in earthquake zones 3, 4 & 5. 

Cost Effective   	  	 
							Use of tmt rebars results in savings of 10-20% compared to CTD bars for same work. 

Strain Ageing   	  	
							Due to unique manufacturing process and chemical composition,   TMT rebars show no tendency of embrittlement either during welding or cold deformation of welded joints. 

							Formability   	  	 
							Due to very high elongation values and consistent properties throughout the length of bar, TMT rebars have excellent workability and bendability. 








� National Steel Co. | Designed by Spectrum





Welcome To National Steel Products

































































































National Steel Products  was established in 1979 and   started operations at Focal Point, Ludhiana, the promoters have 40 years   experience in Electrical works and Street-light Illumination. Currently registered with various Govt., Semi Govt. and private organisations of   repute i.e. NSIC, SSI, CPWD, MES, L&T .We are well equipped with state-of-the-art machinery of   latest technology. We follow strict & stringent rules and regulations in the   process of manufacturing and quality control. We command a well-developed and   ingenious quality testing system which ensures .... 


Read more... 


 


 


 
























 [about Us] [Products] [Quality]  [Infrastructure] [ Contact Us] [Feedback] [E-mail] 








Copyright@2011-12 National Steel Products (All Rights   Reserved) 
 
Powered By : Phoenix   Art




























Welcome To national Steel Products


































































 
 








We have with us a state-of-the-art infrastructure that enable us to meet bulk requirements of our clients within the stipulated time period. Well equipped   with latest machines and equipment, our infrastructure allow us in fabricating   the products as per the prevailing trends. Besides, our infrastructure is spread   over a sprawling area and divided into different departments to ensure flawless   production process
We have installed the following machines at our infrastructure:

Grinding machines   
                  
Plate cutting machines   
                  
Bending machines   
                  
Molding machines   
                  
Special purpose machines 

These machines are technologically advanced and regularly upgraded &   calibrated by our talented team of professionals. Further, we also have a well   maintained export unit which has sound logistic facilities to ensure smooth   transportation of Lighting Fixtures.




Research & Development 


We strive to provide innovative and technically advanced   equipments to our customers. To achieve this purpose we have allotted highly   sophisticated research and development unit for doing research. This cell is   well managed by highly qualified and expert personnel.
These dedicated staff does continuous research on the changing   market circumstances in the industries and technology and help us to adopt the   changes in the production process which helps us deliver latest equipments. We   provide continuous motivation to these men by providing them continuous training   programs and conferences.


 



  
 








[Home] [about Us] [Products] [Quality] [Infrastructure] [Contact Us] [Feedback] [E-mail] 






Copyright@2011-12 National Steel Products (All Rights   Reserved) 
 
Powered By : Phoenix   Art


 

































Welcome To national Steel Products


































































 
 



NATIONAL STEEL PRODUCTS was established in 1979 and started   operations at Focal Point, Ludhiana, the promoters have 40 years experience in   Electrical works and Street-light Illumination. Currently registered with   various Govt., Semi Govt. and private organisations of repute i.e. NSIC, SSI,   CPWD, MES, L&T, Gammon India Ltd, Shree Cement etc.





The company has obtained Punjab Quality Mark certification.pal   Corporations
SCOPE : The products manufactured by the company are   suitable for :-
> Municipal Corporations
>Town   Planning and Development Authorities
> Agro Marketing   Committees
> Colonisers, Park-Landscape   Developers
> Stadiums &   Fountains
> Projects for Hydro and Thermal power   generation. 
> State Electricity Boards For   Transmission.
> Border Flood Lighting by   CPWD.
> Aviation sector by Airports Authority.
The company has complete manufacturing facility for all the   products under one roof. Important issues like Finishing, Quality as per ISI   standards, Testing & Inspection are all carried out with care and   planning.


   



  
 








[Home] [about Us] [Products] [Quality] [Infrastructure] [Contact Us] [Feedback] [E-mail] 






Copyright@2011-12 National Steel Products (All Rights   Reserved) 
 
Powered By : Phoenix   Art


 

































Welcome To national Steel Products
































































 
 







 






 






 


NEXT>>



  
 








[Home] [about Us] [Products] [Quality] [Infrastructure] [Contact Us] [Feedback] [E-mail] 






Copyright@2011-12 National Steel Products (All Rights   Reserved) 
 
Powered By : Phoenix   Art


 










































National Steel Products Company | Houston TX | Get a Bid | BuildZoom


































































×





Want a quote from
National Steel Products Company?


We recommend getting 3 quotes
for any construction project. 
Use our
free bidding system
to get a quote from National Steel Products Company
+ 2 more of the best.



Tell us about your project









Is this your business? Claim now >






N







Alert*



*No active license on file. If you are National Steel Products Company, update license info here.



 Houston, TX 








National Steel Products Company




this is my business



Contact us






Alert*



*No active license on file. If you are National Steel Products Company, update license info here.




WRITE A REVIEW















Summary

this is my business
request a quote















Home

 
/


Search

 
/


Houston

 
/


 best General Contractors in Houston 

 



Updated: Jul 13, 2017





Overview

Their BuildZoom score of 0 does not rank in the top 50% of Texas contractors.If you are thinking of hiring National Steel Products Company, we recommend double-checking their license status with the license board and using our bidding system to get competitive quotes. 




Where National Steel Products Company Works


Google





Project Types Offered



Commercial Construction
Other New Construction
Kitchen Addition
Bathroom Addition
Room Addition
Other Additions
Multi-Room Remodel
Kitchen Remodel
Bathroom Remodel
Basement Remodel
Commercial Renovation
Multi-Family Remodeling
Other Remodeling
Office Renovation
Restaurant Renovation
Retail Renovation
Other Tenant Improvement
Framing
Garage Construction






Contact




Street Address: P O Box 40490, Houston, TX 77040 

Edit





Do you work for this business?
Unlock this free profile
to update company info and see who's viewing your profile.






Similar Contractors
See more









15926 Cypress N Houston, Cypress, TX 77429



Adb Commercial Construction In




License # DC920473


Cypress, TX







101

BZ Score


$446K
Avg Project 


14
Projects














1714 Eagle Point, Crosby, TX 77532



Aurora Commercial Construction, Inc




Crosby, TX







90

BZ Score


$10K
Avg Project 


4
Projects














Montgomery, TX 77316
(512) 982-0120 ext. 17910


Moon Commercial Construction




License not required 


Montgomery, TX







92

BZ Score


-
Avg Project 


-
Projects













National Steel Products Company Reviews



BuildZoom hasn't received any reviews for National Steel Products Company. Click here to be alerted when reviews are posted about them.



Please write a review about National Steel Products Company










1
Rate this contractor







Click stars to rate




2
Provide a detailed review of this contractor.






 














Recent Buildzoom Projects


View all








Custom Home Build










Restaurant Buildout










Swimming Pool Project










Kitchen Remodel










Bathroom Remodel








Request a Quote





Explore BuildZoom

If you are considering hiring National Steel Products Company,
we recommend double-checking their license status with the license board
and using our
bidding system
to get competitive quotes.




Hiring a contractor?






Get bids from BuildZoom's best contractors within 5 mins during regular business hours by filling out this form




I need help with...





Zip Code





Request Quotes From





0


National Steel Products Company








101


Adb Commercial Construction In







90


Aurora Commercial Construction, Inc







92


Moon Commercial Construction






Request a Quote







License info














Inactive License


License #6034StatusInactiveStateNorth CarolinaTypeBuilding


According to the North Carolina Licensing Board for General Contractors, the status of this license was at one point cancelled. However, this information may have changed. If this is your business, please update your license status.Check this license's status for National Steel Products Company at the North Carolina Licensing Board for General Contractors.












ALERT*




BuildZoom Score


How the BuildZoom Score works*No active license on file. If you are National Steel Products Company, update license info here.








Follow this contractor

















Before you Hire

Here are some rules, regulations, and laws governing general contractors
in North Carolina:













Does National Steel Products Company carry a valid contracting license?



In North Carolina a construction project with costs of $30,000 or more requires a contractor to be licensed.
National Steel Products Company currently holds license 6034 (Building), which was Inactive when we last checked. 











How important is contractor licensing in North Carolina?



Contractors in North Carolina must take an exam administered by PSI licensure certification in order to become licensed. 











Your liability risk when hiring National Steel Products Company



Although state law does not require contractors to carry general liability or workers' compensation insurance, hiring contractors who do have an active policy of each insurance is highly recommended. Request a copy of each insurance certificate for your records before any work begins.











Financial recourse when hiring National Steel Products Company



Contractors in North Carolina do not have to obtain a surety bond to perform work on residential properties. Homeowners have financial recourse in North Carolina through The Homeowners Recovery Fund, which provides assistance to eligible North Carolina homeowners who have suffered a financial loss caused by the dishonest or incompetent conduct of a licensed general contractor.











What else should I know before hiring National Steel Products Company



Licensed contractors must furnish proof of financial responsibility to obtain a limited, intermediate, or unlimited license according to a company's working capital. Working capital is current assets minus current liabilities.











How is the BuildZoom score calculated?



The BuildZoom score is based on a number of factors including the contractor's license status, insurance status, verified work history, standing with local consumer interest groups, verified reviews from other BuildZoom users and self-reported feedback from the contractor.











Why you should hire through BuildZoom



When it comes to major construction work or even minor alterations to your home, hiring the wrong contractor could result in incomplete or defective work. You may even find yourself dealing with huge liability claims. BuildZoom does the homework for you and helps you hire the right contractor.











You should get several bids before hiring a contractor



Before hiring a contractor in North Carolina, be sure to get at least 3 detailed bids. Quality contractors will take the time to explain their budget proposal, and help guide you through the estimate process. Be wary of an abnormally low bid, they are not worth the risk. These underpriced projects often do not end well for the homeowner, choose a contractor you trust and can clearly communicate with. BuildZoom has made the bid collection process extremely simple (and free). Just click here to get started.









About BuildZoom






BuildZoom has one simple purpose: To help you find the perfect contractor
for any job, commercial or residential.


BuildZoom is a database of every licensed contractor in the United States.
We work hard to figure out who the great contractors are, and who the bad
contractors are.

more...





BuildZoom combines license information on 3.5 million contractors with
110 million building permits, and over 80,000
reviews from property owners.If you are looking for a specific
contractor and you can’t find them on BuildZoom, it’s likely that they do
not have a license - please
contact us
and we’ll try to help!



Finding a Contractor through BuildZoom



The best way to use BuildZoom is to let us recommend contractors for
your remodeling projects.


Homeowners who

hire through BuildZoom's free bidding system
 report high rates of satisfaction, and homeowners who research
contractors online are twice as likely to be happy at the end of their
project.


If you hire a contractor through BuildZoom, that contractor is
accountable to us. We can enforce standards of behavior, mediate
disputes, and guarantee satisfaction.



Read more about why hiring through BuildZoom is so effective.
 
less...









Press Coverage





BuildZoom’s database now contains every licensed contractor across the U.S. - over 2.5 million of them... Categorized contractor profiles are enriched using government data from state licensing boards, Better Business Bureau ratings, and more…


BuildZoom jumped into the fray by announcing that it raised $10.6 million in a round led by Formation 8. ...the Y combinator-backed startup said it will be focused on remodeling projects, where the median budget is around $19,000…


A new index compiled by BuildZoom — which identifies contractors for projects — found that renovations are
running 2.8 percent above their 2005 level…




















×
Contact National Steel Products Company
We will attempt to deliver your message to National Steel Products Company. We'll notify you when it is delivered.













Your Name

Your Email

Your Phone (optional)

Your Message

I'm interested in speaking with you about a project. Are you available to chat today?

 









‹
›
×




×












 
How the BuildZoom Score Works
Read more about the BuildZoom scoring algorithm here.


A Licensed Contractor Starts with 90 Points.


Their score will increase or decrease based on these variables.
























Positive Client Feedback





Verified License + Insurance





Project History





Community Participation





Profile Page Content


Employee Info
Years in Business
Contact Info
Project Photos









Suspended or Inactive License





Negative Client Feedback





Limited Work History
























Browse remodeling photos
If you are looking for remodeling ideas, you can browse hundreds of beautiful photos of work performed by our general contractors.






Browse building permits
You can use our building permit search to see the contractors who are active in your neighborhood and the projects currently taking place.






Get a cost estimate
Use our remodeling calculator to get a ballpark estimate for your project. If you're ready to hire, use our bidding system to get actual quotes from local contractors.


































































National Steel Company









 














Welcome to National Steel Company


Right from the time, when the Group National Steel Company began its operations in Cochin, in 2003, it had created a comfortable niche for itself while providing a one-stop solution for all steel requirements.

							Established in 2003 Group National Steel Company has emerged as one stop solution provider for all steel components requirements. The Company has been at the forefront of the industry by offering the most extensive range of steel building components and steel pre-engineered building system.

							Always ready to outline the specification and recommend optimal solutions for steel building components requirements, National Steel Company welcome technical inquiries from prospective buyers.

							National Steel Company has been striving from the beginning to blend the right human resources, optimal processes, and right methodologies to make sure that customer gets the best-in-class value and quality.

Our Profile

						  We are very glad to introduce ourselves and our associate concerns as one of the leading supplies of building materials of reputed manufacturers such as Cement, Steel, Sanitarywares, Ceramic Tiles and other allied materials in and around Ernakulam/ Kochi since 1965. And also we are engaged in C&F operation of M/s. Sahyadri Industries Ltd. Pune for the last  4 years.

						  Our associate concerns are located in Ernakulam/ Kochi and it is headed by P.X.Joseph who has started his business in the year of 1965 and developed remarkably well. His sons Mr. Sunil Joseph & Mr. Subin Joseph is also looking after the business under the guidance of their father and moving forward .

						  Our Associate Concerns:


General Traders   
                              Kochi- 682005		  
Suppliers of Cement of reputed manufactures to leading andestablished builders. 


National Agencies
                              West Karuvelipady
Authorised dealer of reputed products such as Sanitarywares, Ceramic Tiles & Plumbing Fixtures


GNC National Housing
                              Projects Vyttila                                
Builders and Developers.


National Chits & Investments Thoppumpady 
Chits & Kurries


National Sanitarywares
                              P.T.Usha Road, EKM
Dealers in Sanitarywares of branded products such as Sanitarywares and Ceramic Tiles & Plumbing Fixtures.


Central Enterprises
Dealers in Cement & Roofing Sheets.


Capital Traders & Agencies
                              Vyttila & Eloor
Traders in Iron & Steel and De-coiling of Steel Bars.



						  We are happy that we are running all the above said concerns in our own premises. Moreover, we have recently stared a Steel De coiling unit at Kalamassery and it is functioning well as expected. And also it may please be noted that all the said firms are maintaining all statutory norms required by the authorities.







We deal High Strength 'Quenched & Self Tempered' rebars (QST, called TMT in India). The technology we employ for the TMT (Quenching box) is German-based EVCON-TURBO and our range... 
Read More





� National Steel Co. | Designed by Spectrum






403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.



Server Error


403 - Forbidden: Access is denied.
You do not have permission to view this directory or page using the credentials that you supplied.












Home - National Steel Industry














































					 

					 

					 
Amman Time :


Saturday, 22 July 2017



























 


Welcome To National Steel Industry

	 

	National steel industry is one of leading steel maker in Jordan with highest international standards.


	The production capacity is 120.000 tons. of reinforcement steel bars with different dia and length, for that national steel considered one of the biggest and the most important steel company in Jordan with heights technology.
	 
Latest News



 ABOUT US  National steel was founded in 1979 as rolling mill factory which product reinforcement steel bars 70 thousand tons per year. At 2013 National Steel... 
 Sunday, 29 May 2016
 Read More... 

 ContactUs  National Steel Industry jordan - zarqa Tel:00962795524816 Tel:00962795524683 Tel:00962797141010 Tel:0096253652802 Fax:0096253653903 E-mail :... 
 Sunday, 29 May 2016
 Read More... 

 Home  Part Of Our Customers and Traders video   
 Sunday, 29 May 2016
 Read More... 

 News   
 Sunday, 29 May 2016
 Read More... 

 PHOTO GALLERY   
 Tuesday, 31 May 2016
 Read More... 













Part Of Our Customers and Traders





video







		 









Designed by kabsetzr company.






































National Steel Products Co. v. Superior Court, 164 Cal. App. 3d 476, 210 Cal. Rptr. 535 – CourtListener.com














Toggle navigation













About
FAQ
Tour

Donate


Sign in / Register




From Free Law Project, a 501(c)(3) non-profit.









Opinions


RECAP Archive


Oral Arguments


Judges


Visualizations 



Gallery


SCOTUS Networks


New Network




Donate










Your Notes

                    (edit)
                     


                    (none)
                




Cited By (10) 




This case has been cited by these opinions:


Hurtado v. Statewide Home Loan Co. (1985)


Shadow Traffic Network v. Superior Court (1994)


Hernandez v. Superior Court (2003)


2,022 RANCH, LLC v. Superior Court (2004)


Dowden v. Superior Court (1999)




                        View All Citing Opinions
                    



Authorities (20)
This opinion cites:



                                Hickman v. Taylor, 329 U.S. 495 (1947)
                            



                                United States v. Procter & Gamble Co., 356 U.S. 677 ...
                            



                                Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court, 364 P.2d 266 (Cal. 1961)
                            



                                Reich v. Purcell, 432 P.2d 727 (Cal. 1967)
                            



                                Valley Bank of Nevada v. Superior Court, 542 P.2d 977 ...
                            




                        View All Authorities
                    



Share



 
        

 
        

 

        





Support FLP 

            CourtListener is a project of Free
            Law Project, a federally-recognized 501(c)(3) non-profit. We
            rely on donations for our financial security.
        
Please support our work with a donation.

Donate Now





National Steel Products Co. v. Superior Court, 164 Cal. App. 3d 476 (Cal. Ct. App. 1985)





                        Sign in or register to save a favorite.
                    

(click to dismiss)



California Court of Appeal

Filed:

                    February 6th, 1985
                    
                


Precedential Status:

                    Precedential
                


Citations:

                    164 Cal. App. 3d 476, 210 Cal. Rptr. 535
                


Docket Number:

                    E001352
                


Judges:
Morris







164 Cal. App. 3d 476 (1985)
210 Cal. Rptr. 535
NATIONAL STEEL PRODUCTS COMPANY, Petitioner,
v.
THE SUPERIOR COURT OF RIVERSIDE COUNTY, Respondent; JULES ROSEN, Real Party in Interest.
Docket No. E001352.
Court of Appeals of California, Fourth District, Division Two.
February 6, 1985.
*481 COUNSEL
Paul, Hastings, Janofsky & Walker, Matthew A. Hodel, Sichol & Hicks and William R. Sichol, Jr., for Petitioner.
No appearance for Respondent.
Rodney L. Walker, Maurer, Higginbotham & Harris and J. Michael Higginbotham for Real Party in Interest.
OPINION
MORRIS, J.
Petitioner, National Steel Products Company, seeks review of an order granting real party in interest, Jules Rosen dba Pantsmaker, discovery of a report prepared by an expert identified as a witness for petitioner in the instant case. Petitioner argues that the report should be nondiscoverable because of the attorney-client and work product privileges, and, in the alternative, that the report should be discoverable only to the extent it is relevant.
The expert's report is a technical engineering analysis of a metal building in New York. It was prepared in 1979 to assist counsel in prior New York *482 litigation in which it was alleged that the building was, among other things, negligently designed, fabricated, and erected by petitioner. Real party in interest was not a party to that litigation. No portion of the report was ever disclosed during the New York litigation. Three pages of the calculations also prepared by the expert were disclosed, one page by court order, two pages voluntarily. The expert was neither deposed nor identified as a trial witness in the New York litigation. The New York litigation was settled prior to trial.
In the instant litigation, real party in interest alleged that petitioner designed, drafted, fabricated and manufactured the components of a metal building in Banning, California, in violation of the American Institute of Steel Construction manual, section 1.10.10 et seq.[1] Petitioner's attorney for the California litigation solicited the expert's New York report from petitioner's counsel for the New York litigation for background purposes. After receiving express authorization from petitioner, New York counsel forwarded the expert's report and calculations. Thereafter, New York counsel was joined as cocounsel for petitioner in the instant litigation.
In addition, petitioner's attorneys commissioned the New York expert to prepare an engineering analysis of the California building. The resulting calculations have been deposed, identified and inspected. The expert's declaration for petitioner states that in preparing his calculations and reaching his opinion regarding the California building, he "... did not refer to, refresh [his] recollection from or rely in any manner upon ..." his 1979 report on the New York building. Petitioner does not intend to offer the New York report as evidence. The expert has been identified as an expert witness in the instant litigation pursuant to Code of Civil Procedure section 2037.

ATTORNEY-CLIENT PRIVILEGE
(1a) Petitioner contends that the expert's prior report is nondiscoverable because it is protected by the attorney-client privilege. We disagree.
(2) If certain prerequisites are met, a client "... has a privilege to refuse to disclose, and to prevent another from disclosing, a confidential *483 communication between client and lawyer...." (Evid. Code, § 954; see City & County of S.F. v. Superior Court (1951) 37 Cal. 2d 227 [231 P.2d 26, 25 A.L.R. 2d 1418].) (3) The purpose of the attorney-client privilege is important; it encourages the client to make complete disclosure to his attorney of all facts, favorable or unfavorable, without fear that others may be informed. (Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court (1961) 56 Cal. 2d 355, 396 [15 Cal. Rptr. 90, 364 P.2d 266]; City & County of S.F. v. Superior Court, supra, at p. 235.) Nevertheless, the privilege is strictly construed because it suppresses relevant facts which may be necessary for a just decision. (Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court, supra, at p. 396.)
(4) Communication by a client retains its confidential nature, though made to an agent of the attorney, if the disclosure to that agent is reasonably necessary for the transmission of the information to the attorney. (Evid. Code, § 952; Witkin, Cal. Evidence (2d ed. 1966) Communication to Lawyer's Agent, § 806, p. 750.) Here, because the attorney for the New York litigation hired the engineering expert to provide a technical analysis on the petitioner's metal building in New York, it was reasonably necessary for the expert to receive information from the client. (See City & County of S.F. v. Superior Court, supra, 37 Cal.2d at p. 237.)
Real party in interest contends that the expert's report here related to a material object of the client, the building in New York, and therefore the expert's analysis of that building did not require "confidential communications" from the client. This contention is valid to the extent the expert's analysis of the material object is based entirely on information available to both litigating parties. (San Diego Professional Assn. v. Superior Court (1962) 58 Cal. 2d 194, 201 [23 Cal. Rptr. 384, 373 P.2d 448, 97 A.L.R. 2d 122, 761]; Grand Lake Drive In v. Superior Court (1960) 179 Cal. App. 2d 122, 126-127 [3 Cal. Rptr. 621, 86 A.L.R. 2d 129].) However, here a declaration submitted by petitioner stated that the expert examined the building and "... received, evaluated and interpreted technical engineering information and communications originating from [the] client."
(5) Although the party asserting the privilege generally has the burden of proof regarding the existence of the privilege (D.I. Chadbourne, Inc. v. Superior Court (1964) 60 Cal. 2d 723, 729 [36 Cal. Rptr. 468, 388 P.2d 700]), the communications sought to be protected are presumed to have been made in confidence (Alpha Beta Co. v. Superior Court (1984) 157 Cal. App. 3d 818, 824-825 [203 Cal. Rptr. 752]; Evid. Code, § 917). Real party in interest fails to overcome this presumption because it submitted no affidavits or declarations stating that the client's communications were not made in confidence.
*484 Real party in interest contends that petitioner waived the attorney-client privilege by expressly authorizing its attorney for the New York litigation to transmit the expert's report on the New York building to its California attorney for the instant litigation.
(6) The attorney-client privilege protects the client. (See Evid. Code, § 954.) The client does not waive this privilege by allowing disclosure of confidential communications to a second attorney when reasonably necessary for the accomplishment of the purpose for which the attorney was hired, as is here the case. (See Evid. Code, § 912, subd. (d).)
Real party in interest also contends that by identifying the expert as a witness the petitioner waived the attorney-client privilege.
(7) "If the client calls his attorney as a witness to testify to matters that the attorney could only have learned through the attorney-client relationship, he waives the privilege...." (People v. Dubrin (1965) 232 Cal. App. 2d 674, 680 [43 Cal. Rptr. 60]; see Winegar v. Gray (1962) 204 Cal. App. 2d 303, 310 [22 Cal. Rptr. 301].) It follows that the same waiver exists when an agent of the attorney is to testify to matters that he could only have learned because of the attorney-client relationship. This is essentially the holding of Sanders v. Superior Court (1973) 34 Cal. App. 3d 270, 280 [109 Cal. Rptr. 970], wherein it was held that the confidential nature of the communication is gone once it is determined that the expert is to be a witness  the client having impliedly, if not actually, consented to the disclosure of the information given to the attorney by way of the expert. (See Evid. Code, § 912, subd. (a).)[2]
Just prior to its holding regarding waiver of the attorney-client privilege, and after a discussion of the work-product privilege, Sanders v. Superior Court, supra, 34 Cal. App.3d at page 279, held that if the party elects to "... call the expert as a witness ... the opposing party shall be granted a reasonable time thereafter within which to conduct appropriate additional discovery directed at securing the desired information." That this language is not later qualified indicates that it is applicable to both the work product and attorney-client privileges.
*485 (8) Consistent with Sanders, under the Discovery Act "[m]aterial which would not be privileged against disclosure at the trial is not privileged against pretrial discovery." (27 Cal.Jur.3d (1976) Discovery and Depositions, § 12, p. 555, fn. omitted; see Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court, supra, 56 Cal.2d at pp. 383-385.) "[F]acts should be liberally construed in favor of discovery, ..." (Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court, supra, at p. 383.) "`The way is now clear, consistent with recognized privileges, for the parties to obtain the fullest possible knowledge of the issues and facts before trial.'" (Id., at p. 385, quoting Hickman v. Taylor (1947) 329 U.S. 495, 501 [91 L. Ed. 451, 457, 67 S. Ct. 383].)
(1b) Accordingly, we hold here applicable the conclusion of Sanders that "... the information and opinion of an expert respecting the subject matter about which he is a prospective witness are subjects of discovery by interrogation or deposition procedures and, if submitted in a report confined thereto, by production of such a report." (Sanders v. Superior Court, supra, 34 Cal. App.3d at p. 279.) In a general sense the prior report is an "... opinion of an expert respecting the subject matter about which he is a prospective witness...." (Ibid.) The expert's testimony, based on observations and confidential communications regarding the California building, will presumably focus on whether petitioner designed, drafted, fabricated and manufactured the components of that metal building in violation of the American Institute of Steel Construction manual, section 1.10.10 et seq. The prior report of this expert of which discovery is sought is about the design, fabrication and erection by petitioner of a metal building in New York.
In addition, because the expert's prospective testimony will necessarily disclose a "significant part" of the privileged communication to the expert, the privilege is waived with respect to all communications to that expert. (See Evid. Code, § 912, subd. (a).)

WORK PRODUCT PRIVILEGE
Petitioner also contends that the expert's prior report is protected from discovery because of the work product privilege.
A threshold inquiry is whether New York law on the work product privilege should here apply because the report sought was prepared for prior litigation in New York. Real party in interest contends that New York case law holds that the attorney's work product privilege does not extend to subsequent litigation, and that New York law should be applied.
(9a) Assuming arguendo that New York law does not extend the work product privilege to subsequent litigation, we hold that California law *486 should be applied in this case. (See Fellows v. Superior Court (1980) 108 Cal. App. 3d 55, 63 [166 Cal. Rptr. 274].) (10) "Questions of choice of law are determined in California ... by the `governmental interest analysis' rather than by the ... `most significant contacts theory.' ... [U]nder the governmental interest analysis approach, the forum in a conflicts situation `must search to find the proper law to apply based upon the interests of the litigants and the involved states.'" (Offshore Rental Co. v. Continental Oil Co. (1978) 22 Cal. 3d 157, 161 [148 Cal. Rptr. 867, 583 P.2d 721]; see Reich v. Purcell (1967) 67 Cal. 2d 551, 553 [63 Cal. Rptr. 31, 432 P.2d 727].) Further, under the governmental interest analysis "`[w]hen one of two states related to a case has a legitimate interest in the application of its law and policy and the other has none, there is no real problem; clearly the law of the interested state should be applied.'" (Hurtado v. Superior Court (1974) 11 Cal. 3d 574, 580 [114 Cal. Rptr. 106, 522 P.2d 666], quoting Currie, Selected Essays on The Conflict of Laws (1963) p. 189, fn. omitted; see Offshore Rental Co. v. Continental Oil Co., supra, at p. 163.)
(9b) Here California has a legitimate interest in the application of its law and policy, and New York has little or none. "It is the policy of [California (i) to preserve the rights of attorneys to prepare cases for trial with that degree of privacy necessary to encourage them to prepare their cases thoroughly and to investigate not only the favorable but the unfavorable aspects of such cases and (ii) to prevent an attorney from taking undue advantage of his adversary's industry or efforts." (Code Civ. Proc., § 2016, subd. (g).) In Fellows v. Superior Court, supra, 108 Cal. App.3d at page 63, these concerns were held to have equal validity to subsequent litigation. Moreover, requiring California courts to determine the exact nature of New York law on this issue would be impractical and burdensome.
In contrast, whatever the policy interests of the New York rule, they have little or no import as applied to this California lawsuit. The building that is the subject of this lawsuit is located in California and petitioner is a Texas corporation with its principal place of business in Texas. Moreover, California law will apply to all substantive issues in this case. Based on these facts, and the narrow context of the conflicts dispute, forum shopping is not a legitimate concern of New York. (See Reich v. Purcell, supra, 67 Cal.2d at pp. 555-556.) Consequently, the interest New York has is purely local and unsubstantial. (See id., at p. 556.) New York can still apply its rule to subsequent litigation in New York.
Real party in interest's contention that New York law regarding the work product privilege for subsequent litigation should apply fails the California governmental interest test. Therefore, the work product discussion below will be based on California law.
*487 The California definition of work product is here satisfied. (11) Within the meaning of work product is "[m]aterial of a derivative or interpretive nature obtained or produced in preparation for trial. Such material includes ... findings, opinions, or reports of experts." (2 Jefferson, Cal. Evid. Benchbook (2d ed. 1982) § 41.1, p. 1473; see Williamson v. Superior Court (1978) 21 Cal. 3d 829, 834 [148 Cal. Rptr. 39, 582 P.2d 126]; Mack v. Superior Court (1968) 259 Cal. App. 2d 7, 10 [66 Cal. Rptr. 280].) In the instant case, the report originally had been prepared for prior litigation involving petitioner, and counsel for petitioner in this litigation obtained the report as background material in preparation for trial.
(12) The work product privilege is conditional as it relates to the expert's report; therefore, "... good cause normally must be shown to compel discovery of expert opinions in advance of trial, ..." (Williamson v. Superior Court, supra, 21 Cal.3d at p. 835.) More specifically, "[t]he work product of an attorney shall not be discoverable unless the court determines that denial of discovery will unfairly prejudice the party seeking discovery in preparing his claim or defense or will result in an injustice, and any writing that reflects an attorney's impressions, conclusions, opinions, or legal research or theories shall not be discoverable under any circumstances." (Code Civ. Proc., § 2016, subd. (b).)
Code of Civil Procedure section 2016, subdivision (b) strikes a balance between the conflicting purposes of the work product privilege and modern discovery rules. On one hand, the work product privilege exists to encourage attorneys to prepare their cases thoroughly and to investigate favorable as well as unfavorable aspects of such cases, and to prevent an attorney from taking undue advantage of his adversary's efforts. (Code Civ. Proc., § 2016, subd. (g); see Hickman v. Taylor, supra, 329 U.S. at p. 511 [91 L.Ed. at p. 462]; Sanders v. Superior Court, supra, 34 Cal. App.3d at pp. 275-276.) On the other hand, the liberal discovery rules of today are meant to "... make a trial less a game of blind man's buff and more a fair contest with the basic issues and facts disclosed to the fullest practicable extent." (United States v. Proctor & Gamble (1958) 356 U.S. 677, 682 [2 L. Ed. 2d 1077, 1082, 78 S. Ct. 983]; see Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court, supra, 56 Cal.2d at p. 376.)
In balancing the work product privilege against discovery, "`[t]he rule predicated on fairness articulated in the decisions is a shield to prevent a litigant from taking undue advantage of his adversary's industry and effort, not a sword to be used to thwart justice or to defeat the salut[a]ry objects of the Discovery Act.'" (Williamson v. Superior Court, supra, 21 Cal.3d at p. 838, quoting Petterson v. Superior Court (1974) 39 Cal. App. 3d 267, 273 [114 Cal. Rptr. 20].) Accordingly, privilege statutes generally are narrowly *488 construed, while discovery statutes are liberally construed. (Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court, supra, 56 Cal.2d at pp. 377, 396; Sullivan v. Superior Court (1972) 29 Cal. App. 3d 64, 72 [105 Cal. Rptr. 241].)
Real party in interest contends that good cause to discover the expert's report exists because the expert was identified as an expert witness.
(13) Generally, good cause includes a showing that the expert may be called as a witness. (Williamson v. Superior Court, supra, 21 Cal.3d at p. 835; see Sanders v. Superior Court, supra, 34 Cal. App.3d at p. 279.) As stated in Swartzman v. Superior Court (1964) 231 Cal. App. 2d 195, 203 [41 Cal. Rptr. 721], "[w]hen it becomes reasonably certain an expert will give his professional opinion as a witness on a material matter in dispute, then his opinion has become a factor in the cause. At that point the expert has ceased to be merely a consultant and has become a counter in the litigation, one to be evaluated along with others. Such evaluation properly includes appropriate pretrial discovery." (Quoted in Williamson v. Superior Court, supra, at pp. 834-835.)
Here the expert of whose report discovery is sought was identified as an expert witness pursuant to Code of Civil Procedure section 2037, subdivision (a). "[F]or each expert witness identified, all discoverable reports and writings concerning each expert witness's proposed testimony and preparations to testify shall be produced according to the provisions of this article." (Code Civ. Proc., § 2037.3.) As discussed in the context of the attorney-client privilege above, in a general sense, on its surface, the New York report concerns the expert witness' proposed testimony. (See Code Civ. Proc., § 2037.3; Review of Selected 1982 California Legislation (1983) 14 Pacific L.J. 357, 465.) The expert's previous report on the New York building may either support or impeach the expert's new conclusions regarding the California building.
(14) Not all work the potential expert witness has performed for counsel, however, is properly the subject of appropriate pretrial discovery. (See Swartzman v. Superior Court, supra, 231 Cal. App.2d at pp. 203-204.) In Scotsman Mfg. Co. v. Superior Court (1966) 242 Cal. App. 2d 527, 531 [51 Cal. Rptr. 511], the product of the expert's services rendered in an advisory capacity was held not removed from the work product limitation upon attempted discovery merely because the expert was a prospective expert witness.
More fully, the court in Scotsman Mfg. Co. v. Superior Court stated that: "[I]f and when the expert becomes a potential witness on behalf of the client the product of his employment is subject to discovery. However, the mere *489 fact the expert may have the dual status of a prospective witness and of adviser to the attorney, does not remove the product of his services rendered exclusively in an advisory capacity, as distinguished from the product of services which qualify him as an expert witness, from the work product limitation upon discovery. Under the ruling in Swartzman, the information and opinion of the expert respecting the subject matter about which he is a prospective witness are subjects of discovery by interrogation or deposition procedures and, if submitted in a report confined thereto, by production of such a report.... However, wherever the report may include the information and opinions of the expert given to the attorney not only in his capacity as a prospective witness but also as an adviser in the preparation of the client's defense, it is subject to the work product limitation prescribed by statute." (Ibid.)
The critical distinction in the rule enunciated by Scotsman is that between services rendered in an advisory capacity and services which qualify one as an expert witness. (See ibid.) Nevertheless, so far as we can determine, California courts heretofore have not expressly elaborated on this aspect of Scotsman. We believe some elucidation would be beneficial.
We hold that an expert's report rendered in an advisory capacity is one designed to assist the attorney in such matters as preparation of pleadings, the manner of presentation of proof, and cross-examination of opposing expert witnesses; matters that are often reflective of the mental processes of the attorney under whose direction the expert works. (See State v. Circuit Court for Milwaukee County (1967) 34 Wis. 2d 559 [150 N.W.2d 387, 408, 35 A.L.R. 3d 377].) In contrast, we hold that a report which would qualify the author as an expert witness is one containing findings and opinions of the expert that go to the establishment or denial of a principal fact in issue. (See ibid.; but see Kennedy, Cal. Expert Witness Guide (1983) § 6.4, pp. 139-141.)
Applying the above analysis, it will often be necessary for the trial judge to conduct a three-step in camera inspection of the report of an expert identified as a witness in order to rule on the claim of the attorney's work product privilege. (Cf. Fellows v. Superior Court, supra, 108 Cal. App.3d at p. 68.)
First the judge should determine if the report, in whole or part, "... reflects an attorney's impressions, conclusions, opinions, or legal research or theories...." (Code Civ. Proc., § 2016, subd. (b).) The work product that this definition represents is absolutely privileged; it cannot be discovered under any circumstances. (Ibid.) The judge need go no further in his *490 analysis unless all or easily severable portions of the report do not so reflect the thoughts of an attorney.
Steps two and three of the in camera inspection are applicable only to those portions of the report that are not absolutely privileged. In step two the trial judge should determine whether the report, in whole or part, is advisory or not pursuant to the above elaboration of Scotsman. The portions of the report that are advisory are protected by the conditional work product privilege; the portions that are not advisory are discoverable if easily severable.
Finally, in step three, which is applicable only to advisory portions of the report that are not absolutely privileged, if any, the judge should determine whether other good cause for discovery outweighs the principles supporting the conditional work product privilege. (See Petterson v. Superior Court, supra, 39 Cal. App.3d at p. 272; Scotsman Mfg. Co. v. Superior Court, supra, 242 Cal. App.2d at p. 530.) (15) As stated in Petterson v. Superior Court, supra, at page 272, "... if an expert is retained by an attorney only for the purpose of advising or assisting counsel to prepare his case, the expert's observations and opinions ordinarily are irrelevant, and ... may not be [discovered] by the adversary party unless there is some other compelling reason for [discovery]."[3]
Real party in interest contends another compelling reason exists to obtain the engineering report of petitioner's expert witness even though it was originally prepared for prior litigation, in that the prior report may impeach the expert witness' new findings and testimony. In this regard there is also no comparable substitute for the prior report.
These factors, if supported by an in camera inspection of the report, are in combination sufficiently significant to be weighed against the work product privilege. (16) To begin with, the need for pretrial discovery to prepare for cross-examination and rebuttal of an expert witness is the same or greater than it is with a lay witness. (Kennemur v. State of California (1982) 133 Cal. App. 3d 907, 916-917 [184 Cal. Rptr. 393].) Accordingly, an expert witness may be cross-examined regarding any scientific, technical, or professional publication if: "(1) The witness referred to, considered, or *491 relied upon such publication in arriving at or forming his opinion; or, (2) Such publication has been admitted in evidence." (Evid. Code, § 721, subd. (b).)
By declaration for petitioner the expert states that he did not refer to or rely on his prior report in preparing for the instant litigation. Nevertheless, "... it is important to permit an expert witness to be cross-examined concerning those publications referred to or considered by him even though not specifically relied on by him in forming his opinion. An expert's reasons for not relying on particular publications that were referred to or considered by him while forming his opinion may reveal important information bearing upon the credibility of his testimony." (Law Revision Com. com., Deering's Ann. Evid. Code (1966 ed.) § 721, p. 533, italics added.) Here it is reasonable to infer that the expert considered his prior engineering report in his preparations for trial. This is because the expert's prior report and current preparations had much in common; both were completed to help defend against civil lawsuits that concerned petitioner's design and fabrication of metal buildings. Moreover, the prior report was compiled within five years of the expert's instant preparations for trial.
(17) Determining whether "`... denial of discovery will unfairly prejudice the party seeking discovery in preparing his claim or defense or will result in an injustice ...' [Code Civ. Proc., § 2016, subd. (b)] ... requires that a court weigh carefully the power of impeachment as a valuable tool in the process of truth ascertainment against the benefits of protecting the privilege of `work product'" (Jasper Construction, Inc. v. Foothill Junior College Dist. (1979) 91 Cal. App. 3d 1, 17 [153 Cal. Rptr. 767]; see Brown v. Superior Court (1963) 218 Cal. App. 2d 430, 443 [32 Cal. Rptr. 527]).
Another compelling reason for permitting discovery is the inability to obtain an adequate substitute for that which is sought by discovery. In Petterson v. Superior Court, supra, 39 Cal. App.3d at page 272, the court stated that "[i]t would be unthinkable to adopt a rule which, for example, would prohibit a litigant from taking the deposition of an expert who has examined or tested a relevant object even though the object is no longer available or the testing so altered the object tested that the adversary party cannot make like tests, merely because the party who retained the expert has elected not to call him as a witness. It is patent that such a rule would not be consonant with ordinary principles of fairness or the interests of justice." (See Grand Lake Drive In v. Superior Court, supra, 179 Cal. App.2d at p. 127.) The situation in the instant case is similar to that discussed in Petterson. Real party in interest has no adequate substitute for the report it seeks, because the potential impeachment value of the report *492 lies in the fact that it was prepared by the expert identified as a witness for petitioner, and may include inconsistent prior statements of that witness.
Therefore, in step three of the judge's in camera inspection of the expert's report, the impeachment value and uniqueness of the portions of the report remaining for evaluation after steps one and two should be weighed against the protections of the conditional work product privilege.

RELEVANCE
Petitioner contends that even if the attorney-client and work product privileges are inapplicable, the trial judge should order the prior New York report to be produced only to the extent relevant to the issues raised in the instant litigation. Further, petitioner contends that because real party in interest "... in its interrogatory responses had alleged simply that the Banning building violated only a specific provision of the American Institute of Steel Construction's Manual of Steel Construction AISC, Section 1.10.10," the report and calculations should be produced only to the extent they concern this specific provision. We agree that on remand the trial judge should evaluate the relevance of the New York report, but find the application of this concept suggested by petitioner to be erroneous. Petitioner misreads the interrogatory response of the real party in interest. Real party in interest's response did not allege that only section 1.10.10 of the American Institute of Steel Construction (AISC) manual was violated, but rather that AISC manual section 1.10.10 et seq. were violated. Moreover, it appears from answers to other interrogatories that real party in interest is still awaiting information; such information might lead to further specific allegations.
With these facts in mind, we turn to a brief analysis of the scope of discovery permitted by law for consideration by the trial judge when he conducts the in camera inspection of the New York report on remand.
(18) The trial court has broad discretion in ruling on discovery, and will only be overturned for an abuse of discretion. (Perkins v. Superior Court (1981) 118 Cal. App. 3d 761, 765 [173 Cal. Rptr. 596].) (19) "[D]iscovery of all relevant material during the time of preparation is the aim of the [Discovery Act]...." (Greyhound Corp. v. Superior Court, supra, 56 Cal. 2d 355, 384.) Relevancy is a broader concept than relevancy to the issues, the standard is relevancy to the subject matter, which is determined by potential, not actual, issues in the case. (City of Los Angeles v. Superior Court (1973) 33 Cal. App. 3d 778, 782 [109 Cal. Rptr. 365].) Further, discovery of unprivileged information should generally be permitted if it "... appears reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of *493 admissible evidence." (Code Civ. Proc., § 2016, subd. (b); see Code Civ. Proc., § 2031, subd. (a).) In accordance with the liberal policies underlying the discovery procedures, doubts as to relevance should be resolved in favor of permitting discovery. (Valley Bank of Nevada v. Superior Court (1975) 15 Cal. 3d 652, 656 [125 Cal. Rptr. 553, 542 P.2d 977].)

DISPOSITION
IT IS ORDERED that a peremptory writ of mandate issue commanding the Riverside Superior Court to set aside its order granting unlimited discovery of the report and to conduct an in camera inspection of the expert's report to determine, consistent with this opinion, (1) the extent to which the report is protected by the work product privilege, and (2) whether the report is relevant. The Riverside Superior Court shall allow discovery of the report to the extent that it is both unprotected and relevant.
McDaniel, J., and Rickles, J., concurred.
NOTES
[1]  The parties dispute whether the New York report is relevant to the instant litigation. Although neither this court nor real party in interest have seen the report, we will assume for purposes of discussing the attorney-client and work product privileges below that the report is relevant. We make this assumption because the previous report and the allegations here both involve the design and fabrication of metal buildings by petitioner. Nevertheless, as we also discuss below, to the extent the report upon inspection is found to be irrelevant, this is an independent basis for holding the report to be nondiscoverable.
[2]  On its surface Grand Lake Drive In v. Superior Court, supra, 179 Cal. App.2d at page 128, appears contra to the holding of Sanders, stating that communications between a party's attorney and the expert hired by that attorney are not unprivileged because the expert was engaged for the purpose of testifying at trial. The reasoning of the court was that: "To apply this limitation in the normal attorney-client relationship would remove the privilege from all consultations which had to do with preparation of the client to take the witness stand." (Ibid.) The narrow context of this dictum, consultation by the attorney to prepare a witness for the witness stand, is here irrelevant. The larger concept of waiver of the attorney-client privilege regarding communications from the client by identifying an attorney's agent/expert as a witness is not considered in the Grand Lake opinion. (Ibid.)
[3]  It might be argued that when an expert is reasonably certain to be a witness, Scotsman limits discovery to "... the product of services which qualify him as an expert witness ...," regardless of whether other good cause for discovery exists. (See Scotsman Mfg. Co. v. Superior Court, supra, 242 Cal. App.2d at p. 531.) Such an argument, however, would be unrealistic. "In the infinite variety of circumstances which may arise in the course of human activity, as revealed in the complexities of litigation, many other factors may, collectively or individually, justify inquiry into the acts and thoughts of the independent expert." (Grand Lake Drive In v. Superior Court, supra, 179 Cal. App.2d at p. 131.)
















































National Steel Corp.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 21, 2017 9:54 PM ET
Metals and Mining

Company Overview of National Steel Corp.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
National Steel Corp. went out of business. As per its Chapter 11/7 liquidation filing under bankruptcy. Prior to May 2003, National Steel Corporation operated as an integrated steel producer in the United States and engaged in the manufacture and sale of various flat rolled carbon steel products, including hot-rolled; cold-rolled; galvanized; tin; and chrome plated steels. The company’s flat rolled carbon steel was sold primarily to the automotive, construction, pipe and tube, service centers, and container markets. The company was founded in 1929 and is based in Mishawaka, Indiana. In May 2003, the company completed the sale of substantially all of its principal steelmaking and finishing as...
National Steel Corp. went out of business. As per its Chapter 11/7 liquidation filing under bankruptcy. Prior to May 2003, National Steel Corporation operated as an integrated steel producer in the United States and engaged in the manufacture and sale of various flat rolled carbon steel products, including hot-rolled; cold-rolled; galvanized; tin; and chrome plated steels. The company’s flat rolled carbon steel was sold primarily to the automotive, construction, pipe and tube, service centers, and container markets. The company was founded in 1929 and is based in Mishawaka, Indiana. In May 2003, the company completed the sale of substantially all of its principal steelmaking and finishing assets, and iron ore pellet operations to United States Steel Corporation for an aggregate purchase price of approximately $1.05 billion. On March 6, 2002, National Steel Corporation filed a voluntary petition for reorganization under Chapter 11 in the U.S. Bankruptcy Court for the Northern District of Illinois, Chicago. The plan was later approved as liquidation plan on October 23, 2003.
Detailed Description


4100 Edison Lakes ParkwayMishawaka, IN 46545-3440United StatesFounded in 19298,229 Employees



Phone: 574-273-7000

Fax: 574-273-7868








Key Executives for National Steel Corp.


National Steel Corp. does not have any Key Executives recorded. 



National Steel Corp. Key Developments

Steel Asia Eyes National Steel
Mar 19 17
Steel Asia Manufacturing Corporation (SteelAsia) offered to acquire National Steel Corp. from the government and convert it into a state-of-the-art steel manufacturing complex. Lourdes Rebueno, General Manager of state-owned National Development Co., said it received a proposal from SteelAsia about its plan to negotiate with all valid claimants of National Steel, including the government, for an asset-purchase arrangement.


Iligan City Auctions National Steel Corp
Dec 15 16
Four-hundred hectares of land and properties of the foreclosed National Steel Corp. have been auctioned by the local government due to tax delinquency. "NSC's unpaid tax amounts to over PHP 4 billion," Iligan City acting Mayor Jemar Vera Cruz said. However, there was no bidder during the auction, which prompted the city treasurer to forfeit the properties in favor of the city government.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 101 Pipe & Casing, Inc. United States 2Dye4 Anodizing, Inc United States 3 Dimensional Services, Inc. United States 3D Stone, Inc. United States 4-M Precision Stamping, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact National Steel Corp., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























NATIONAL STEEL PRODUCTS I - CORRY, PA - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



PA



CORRY



Metals Service Centers and offices



Wholesale - Iron And Steel (ferrous) Products



                            NATIONAL STEEL PRODUCTS I
                                    



 





















N 


NATIONAL STEEL PRODUCTS I
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



26 W WASHINGTON ST CORRY, PA 16407
Get Directions



(814) 664-7898





Business Info



 Founded 2007
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $1,400,000.00
 Employee Count 13
 Industries Wholesale - Iron And Steel (ferrous) Products
 Contacts GEORGE R DEVENNEY







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 2007, National Steel Products I has been providing Wholesale - Iron And Steel (ferrous) Products from Corry. National Steel Products I has estimated annual revenues of $1,400,000.00 and also employs an estimated 13 employees. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







N

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.




























NATIONAL STEEL INDUSTRY CO., LTD.

























Home
Service
Service Overview
Customized Sourcing


台灣經貿網
English
正體中文
日本語
简体中文
Русский
Español
Português
العربية
Indonesia
Tiếng Việt Nam
ภาษาไทย


Favorites(0)
Sign In
Register
guest no cache from cms-cm:172.17.0.9








Product
Product
Supplier
Sample




Advanced





Home

Company

NATIONAL STEEL INDUSTRY CO., LTD.










NATIONAL STEEL INDUSTRY CO., LTD.
                                 Add to favorites






Company Name:NATIONAL STEEL INDUSTRY CO., LTD.
Business Type:Exporter
																			,
																		Importer
																			,
																		Manufacturer
																			,
																		OEM
																			,
																		ODM
Year Established:2012
Tel (1):+03-3330-557
Tel (2):--
Zip Code:32699
Address:4F.,No.13,Xiao 1st St.,Taoyuan Dist.,Taoyuan City 330,Taiwan(R.O.C.)
Main Product:Roller Door
Roller Shutter
Formimg Machine
Hardware
Grease Gun
Main Export Market:Australia
																			,
																		Fiji
																			,
																		New Zealand
																			,
																		Indonesia
																			,
																		Myanmar
																			,
																		Malaysia
																			,
																		Singapore
																			,
																		Thailand
																			,
																		Viet Nam
																			,
																		United Arab Emirates
																			,
																		Sri Lanka
																			,
																		Philippines



Products

New


Air Grease Gun Com..

New


Multi-Purpose Lith..

New


Cordless Grease Gun

New


Universal Power Co..

New


Slide-on 90 Degree..

New


Metallic Rigid Spo..

New


Needle Nozzle Exte..

New


Nipple Series

New


Clear Tube Grease ..

New


King Kong Grease Gun




Contact Information

Contact Person:Mr.Yeh
Contact Supplier
Phone Number:+886-3-3330557
Office Address:330 4F.,No.13,Xiao 1st St.,Taoyuan Dist.,Taoyuan City 330,Taiwan(R.O.C.)

Last Update:
													2017-03-21
N/A
N/A
N/A

Contact Supplier



To:

Mr.Yeh
																	,
																	NATIONAL STEEL INDUSTRY CO., LTD.




CC:
Use ; or , to separate multiple recipients








From:


Sign in to have your contact details filled in for youSign In



 

*Email
Send a Copy to Myself



 

*Re-enter Email
Verified



 

*Subject




 

*Message




 


Upload file formats
																		:
																		htm、html、doc、docx、pdf、txt、jpg、gif、png



 

Estimated Purchase Amount USD




 


Continue







Contact Supplier



 


																		<
																		Back to previous step



 

*Full Name


Mrs.
Ms.
Mr.



 

*Company Name




 

*Location

Please Select a Country
Greece
Croatia
Hungary
Ireland
Iceland
Kyrgyzstan
Kazakhstan
Liechtenstein
Luxembourg
Latvia
Morocco
Republic of Moldova
Malta
Netherlands
Norway
Poland
Portugal
Romania
Russian Federation
Sweden
Slovenia
Slovakia (Slovak Republic)
San Marino
Tajikistan
Turkmenistan
Ukraine
Vatican City
Angola
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Benin
Botswana
Central African Republic
Congo
Cote D'Ivoire
Cameroon
Cape Verde
Djibouti
Algeria
Egypt
Western Sahara
Eritrea
Ethiopia
Gabon
Ghana
Sao Tome and Principe
Tanzania, United Republic Of
Canada
Heard and Mc Donald Island
Antigua And Barbuda
Bahamas
Cuba
Grenada
Martinique
Puerto Rico
Turks And Caicos Islands
Brazil
Ecuador
Suriname
Cook Islands
Micronesia, Federated States Of
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Bhutan
Sri Lanka
Philippines
Cyprus
Saudi Arabia
Albania
Azerbaijan
Czech Republic
Finland
Gibraltar
Italy
Macedonia
Federal Islamic Republic of the Comoros
Haiti
Solomon Islands
Afghanistan
Uzbekistan
Lithuania
Bolivia
St Vincent
Paraguay
Turkey
Belarus
Democratic Republic of Congo
Republic of Somaliland
State of Palestine
Republic of South Sudan
Other
Montenegro
Serbia
Niue
Equatorial Guinea
Guinea Bissau
Kenya
Liberia
Lesotho
Libyan Arab Jamahiriya
Monaco
Madagascar
Mali
Mauritania
Mauritius
Malawi
Mozambique
Namibia
Niger
Nigeria
Reunion
Rwanda
Seychelles
Sudan
Sierra Leone
Senegal
Somalia
Swaziland
Chad
Togo
Tunisia
Uganda
South Africa
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Greenland
Guadeloupe
St. Pierre and Miquelon
St. Helena
United States of America
Anguilla
Netherlands Antilles
Barbados
Bermuda
Belize
Costa Rica
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Guatemala
Honduras
Jamaica
Saint Christopher (St. Kitts) and Nevis
Cayman Islands
Saint Lucia
Montserrat
Mexico
Nicaragua
Panama
El Salvador
Trinidad And Tobago
Virgin Islands (British)
Virgin Islands (U.S.)
Nevis
F T/C C A
BR T/C C A
Argentina
Aruba
Chile
Colombia
Falkland Islands (Malvinas)
French Guiana
S. Georgia And The S. Sandwich Islands
Guyana
Peru
Uruguay
Venezuela
American Samoa
Australia
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Christmas Island
Fiji
Guam
Kiribati
Marshall Islands
Northern Mariana Islands
Maldives
New Caledonia
Norfolk Island
Nauru
New Zealand
French Polynesia
Papua New Guinea
Palau
Tokelau
Tonga
East Timor
Tuvalu
Vanuatu
Wallis And Futuna Islands
Samoa
Tahiti
Other Oceania
US T/P P A
Antarctica
Bougainville Island
British Indian Ocean Territory
Neutral Zone
Pitcairn
Svalbard And Jan Mayen Islands
French Southern Territories
Mayotte
Gambia
Guinea
Bangladesh
Brunei Darussalam
Mainland China
Hong Kong
Indonesia
India
Japan
Cambodia
Korea, North Korea
Korea, South Korea
Lao People's Democratic Republic
Myanmar
Mongolia
Macau
Malaysia
Nepal
Pakistan
Singapore
Thailand
Taiwan, ROC
Viet Nam
Ryukyu
United Arab Emirates
Bahrain
Israel
Iraq
Iran
Jordan
Kuwait
Lebanon
Oman
Qatar
Syrian Arab Republic
Yemen
Andorra
Armenia
Austria
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Belgium
Bulgaria
Switzerland
Germany
Denmark
Estonia
Spain
Faroe Islands
France
France, Metropolitan
United Kingdom
Georgia



 

*Company Site
Not Available



 

Business PhoneExt.
+#



 


Submit












Loading ...
                  















Submit







Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Steel Industry 2017















Search industry reports, statistics & slideshows











Steel Industry 2017

View Trends, Analysis and Statistics.
Reportlinker.com offers immediate download access to top market reports on the Steel Industry.




                View >
              



                  Global Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


378 Reports
Supply, Company Financials, Demand…


4330 Statistics
Market Size, Supply, Demand…




                View >
              



                  US Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


775 Reports
Trade, Supply, Company Financials…


6379 Statistics
Market Size, Trade, Supply…




                View >
              



                  European Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


335 Reports
Supply, Company Financials, Market Size…


3922 Statistics
Market Size, Trade, Supply…




                View >
              



                  Chinese Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


894 Reports
Supply, Trade, Demand…


7403 Statistics
Market Size, Supply, Trade…




                View >
              



                  UK Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


78 Reports
Supply, Market Size, Demand…


1111 Statistics
Market Size, Supply, Trade…




                View >
              



                  Indian Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


575 Reports
Supply, Demand, Trade…


5187 Statistics
Market Size, Demand, Trade…




                View >
              



                  Australian Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


164 Reports
Trade, Supply, Demand…


1522 Statistics
Market Size, Supply, Trade…




                View >
              



                  Canadian Steel Industry 2017-2021
                


39 Reports
Trade, Supply, Company Financials…


651 Statistics
Market Size, Trade, Supply…





            You may also be interested in
              these Steel Industry reports,
            published by private editors
          




 
                    Global Steel




                  December 2016
                

                  $ 349
                



 
Steel Global Industry Data
                



                  November 2015
                

                  $ 349
                



 
                    World Steel Pipe Industry
                



                  February 2016
                

                  $ 6200
                



 
Steel in South Korea
                



                  December 2016
                

                  $ 349
                



 
Steel in India
                



                  December 2016
                

                  $ 349
                



> View more reports 






24/7 Customer Support



            Talk to Sam

+33 9 70 44 05 99

            Send your request
          



More countries



                  Asia: 110 Reports




                  Germany: 74 Reports




                  South Africa: 47 Reports




                  Brazil: 80 Reports




                  Saudi Arabia: 9 Reports




                  Japan: 170 Reports




                  Russia: 130 Reports




                  Mexico: 17 Reports




                  France: 22 Reports




                  United Arab Emirates: 7 Reports




                  Malaysia: 16 Reports




                  Italy: 17 Reports




                  Spain: 31 Reports




                  Singapore: 17 Reports




                  Turkey: 36 Reports




                  Indonesia: 10 Reports




                  Nigeria: 5 Reports




                  Austria: 19 Reports




                  Pakistan: 18 Reports




                  Bangladesh: 3 Reports




                  North America: 55 Reports




                  Taiwan: 36 Reports




                  Thailand: 35 Reports




                  Iran: 33 Reports




                  Oman: 15 Reports




                  Sweden: 14 Reports




                  Poland: 13 Reports




                  Oceania: 11 Reports




                  Chile: 10 Reports




                  South Korea: 82 Reports




                  Belgium: 9 Reports




                  Ukraine: 23 Reports




                  Norway: 7 Reports




                  Netherlands: 7 Reports




                  Vietnam: 42 Reports




                  Czech Republic: 6 Reports




                  Egypt: 6 Reports




                  Luxembourg: 20 Reports




                  Africa: 5 Reports




                  OECD: 5 Reports




                  Greece: 5 Reports




                  Slovakia: 5 Reports




                  Bahrain: 4 Reports




                  MENA: 4 Reports




                  Mozambique: 4 Reports




                  South America: 3 Reports




                  New Zealand: 18 Reports


+ More countries
- Less countries



Related industries



                  Iron Ore
                



                  Stainless Steel
                



                  Carbon Steel
                



                  Cast Iron
                









Support center
Privacy policy 
Terms and conditions
About us



Reportlinker.com © Copyright 2017. All rights reserved.
    		ReportLinker simplifies how Analysts and Decision Makers get industry data for their business.
    
    	






✕
Your inquiry


Subject



First Name *



Last Name *



Company *



Email *



Phone



Message *





Send your request




        Thank you for contacting Reportlinker.com !
      

        One of our research specialists is preparing an answer.
      

        You will be contacted within 24 hours.
      



        Your request is being sent.
      



        An error occurred while sending your request. Please try again later, we are investigating the issue.
      

        Meanwhile, you can contact us by phone.
      



First Name is required
Last Name is required
Company is required
Email is required
Please enter a valid email address.
Message is required






































Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          




























Amazon Prime

































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















All



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 





















































































There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started































 

Simplify your life with Amazon PrimeWhere savings happen and entertainment lives. 







Start your 30-day Prime free trial 

After your free trial, Amazon Prime is just $10.99/month.  Cancel anytime.
                    
                              See more plans  ›


Give the gift of Prime | 
                            Refer a friend | 
                            Have a Prime promo code?




    
    
    



Fast, FREE shipping on over 50 million eligible itemsChoose from FREE Two-Hour, Same-Day or Two-Day Delivery with Prime    
    
    



Need a last minute gift? Can’t get out of the house? Realize you forgot to pick up something? With FREE Two-Day Shipping and more from Amazon Prime, your shopping problems are solved. You get unlimited deliveries with no minimum order size, and with millions of eligible items, the options are practically limitless. When shipping to select metro areas, Prime members also get FREE Same-Day Delivery on over a million items and FREE 2-hour delivery with Prime Now on daily essentials and groceries. With FREE release-date delivery on eligible pre-order items, you can enjoy highly anticipated books, movies, and video games as soon as possible. 
Learn more about all the Prime shipping options

    
    
    



Enjoy instant access to video streaming    
    
    



Prime includes popular movies and TV shows    
    
    



Make every night a movie night with Prime Video. Your Prime membership includes instant access to thousands of movies and TV shows at no additional cost. Catch Amazon Original Series like Golden Globe-winning Transparent, Mozart in the Jungle, and Goliath, Emmy-winning Man in the High Castle, or exciting and wildly popular The Grand Tour. Stream on select Smart TVs, Roku, Xbox, Amazon Fire TV, iPhones, tablets, and Android devices. Download entertainment to your device to watch offline anywhere.
Browse movies and TV shows
    
    
    



Over two million songs. Thousands of playlists and stations.    
    
    



On-demand, ad-free music streaming     
    
    



Prime Music is a music streaming benefit featuring a growing selection of two million songs, Alexa voice-integration, and personalized recommendations at no additional cost with your Amazon Prime Membership. Unlock even more music with Amazon Music Unlimited, plus get an exclusive Prime member discount.
Learn more
    
    
    



Books, Magazines & More    
    
    



Unlimited reading on any device    
    
    



Prime Reading gives you unlimited access to over a thousand books, current issue magazines, books with Audible narration, comics, Kindle Singles, and more. With access from any device – including your phone, tablet, or Kindle – you can read however you want, whenever you want.
Learn more
    
    
    



Original audio series from Audible    
    
    



Unlimited listening to original audio series    
    
    



Get hooked on original audio series from Audible: hunt for clues with intrepid investigators, think big with bold visionaries, or ‘keep it real’ with fearless comedians. Listen to insightful and engaging playlists handcrafted for every interest and refreshed daily, drawing from news, comedy shows, articles, talks and more. Whether you want to turn rush hour into an adventure with a great story or master a new topic while riding the train, your commute will never be the same. Audible Channels–from Audible, a world leader in audio entertainment.
Learn More
    
    
    



Twitch Prime    
    
    



Get free game content every month, exclusive discounts, plus loads more    
    
    



Get a member exclusive discount on new release and preorder boxed video games. You'll get characters, vehicles, skins, and boosts for top games on Twitch, plus surprises like full indie games and exclusive loot. You also receive ad-free viewing and a free monthly Twitch channel subscription to support your favorite streamer.
Learn more
    
    
    



All your photos, together at last    
    
    



Free unlimited photo storage    
    
    



Your Prime membership comes with free unlimited photo storage through Prime Photos, which lets you securely save as many photos as you like and see them on your phone, computer, or tablet. You can share this Prime benefit and give free photo storage to up to five family members or friends. Collect photos together with your invited family and friends in the Family Vault and store memories from everyone in one safe place. New photo search technology makes it easy to find specific photos by searching for things like “sunset” or “Seattle,” and your photos are organized automatically so it’s easy to find and enjoy them.
Learn more
    
    
    



Prime Rewards    
    
    



Cardmembers earn 5% Back with a Prime Credit Card.    
    
    



Eligible Prime members can earn 5% back at Amazon.com using the Amazon Prime Rewards Visa Card or the Amazon Prime Store card. All Prime members earn 2% rewards on their debit spending with Amazon Prime Reload.
Learn More

    
    
    



Get Early Access    
    
    



30-minute early access to select Amazon Lightning Deals    
    
    



Consider yourself a techy, the best-styled fashionista on the block, or just an everyday savvy shopper? Be among the first to decide what's hot and what's not. Get 30-minute early access to select Lightning Deals on Amazon.

Shop Amazon Lightning Deals

Look for Prime eligible items, videos, music and Kindle books are clearly marked. Just look for the Prime logo when you shop. 














  Back to top      Get to Know Us   Careers   About Amazon   Investor Relations   Amazon Devices      Make Money with Us   Sell on Amazon   Sell Your Services on Amazon   Sell on Amazon Business   Sell Your Apps on Amazon   Become an Affiliate   Advertise Your Products   Self-Publish with Us   Become an Amazon Vendor   Sell Your Subscription on Amazon   › See all      Amazon Payment Products   Amazon Rewards Visa Signature Cards   Amazon.com Store Card   Amazon.com Corporate Credit Line   Shop with Points   Credit Card Marketplace   Reload Your Balance   Amazon Currency Converter      Let Us Help You   Your Account   Your Orders   Shipping Rates & Policies   Amazon Prime   Returns & Replacements   Manage Your Content and Devices   Amazon Assistant   Help                   English   United States          Amazon Music Stream millionsof songs       Amazon Drive Cloud storagefrom Amazon       6pm Score dealson fashion brands       AbeBooks Books, art& collectibles       ACX Audiobook PublishingMade Easy       Alexa Actionable Analyticsfor the Web       Amazon Business Everything ForYour Business          AmazonFresh Groceries & MoreRight To Your Door       AmazonGlobal Ship OrdersInternationally       Home Services Handpicked ProsHappiness Guarantee       Amazon Inspire Digital EducationalResources       Amazon Rapids Fun stories forkids on the go       Amazon Restaurants Food delivery fromlocal restaurants       Amazon Video Direct Video DistributionMade Easy          Amazon Web Services Scalable CloudComputing Services       Audible DownloadAudio Books       AudiobookStand Discount Audiobookson Disc       Book Depository Books With FreeDelivery Worldwide       Box Office Mojo Find MovieBox Office Data       ComiXology Thousands ofDigital Comics       CreateSpace Indie Print PublishingMade Easy          DPReview DigitalPhotography       East Dane Designer Men'sFashion       Fabric Sewing, Quilting& Knitting       Goodreads Book reviews& recommendations       IMDb Movies, TV& Celebrities       IMDbPro Get Info EntertainmentProfessionals Need       Junglee.com Shop Onlinein India          Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital PublishingMade Easy       Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Deliveryon Everyday Items       Prime Photos Unlimited Photo StorageFree With Prime       Shopbop DesignerFashion Brands       TenMarks.com Math Activitiesfor Kids & Schools       Warehouse Deals Open-BoxDiscounts       Whispercast Discover & DistributeDigital Content               Withoutabox Submit toFilm Festivals       Woot! Deals andShenanigans       Zappos Shoes &Clothing       Souq.com Shop Online inthe Middle East       Subscribe with Amazon Discover & trysubscription services               Conditions of Use   Privacy Notice   Interest-Based Ads   © 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates    










v




























Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings













































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v























